Maryland, session 2025, HB0337.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
11–404.
(d) (1) If 140 or more days of live racing in a year are held at Laurel Race
Course, the Comptroller shall pay:
(i) for each day of live racing, $2,000 to Anne Arundel County, $500
to Howard County, and $300 to the City of Laurel; and
– 1 –

Ch. 403 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) for each additional day of intertrack betting without live racing
held, $1,000 to Anne Arundel County, $250 to Howard County, and $150 to the City of
Laurel.
(2) If fewer than 140 days of live racing in a year are held at Laurel Race
Course, the Comptroller shall pay:
(i) for each day of live racing or each day of intertrack betting
without live racing held, up to a maximum payment for 140 days, $2,000 to Anne Arundel
County, $500 to Howard County, and $300 to the City of Laurel; and
(ii) for each additional day of intertrack betting without live racing
held, $1,000 to Anne Arundel County, $250 to Howard County, and $150 to the City of
Laurel.
Article – State Government
9–120.
(b) (1) By the end of the month following collection, the Comptroller shall
deposit, cause to be deposited, or pay:
(xiii) after June 30, 2024, a supplemental local impact grant of
$3,000,000 each fiscal year to the County Executive and County Council of Prince George’s
County from the money that remains in the State Lottery Fund from the proceeds of all
lotteries after the distributions under subsection (a) of this section and items (i) through
(xii) of this paragraph to be distributed in Prince George’s County in accordance with §
9–1A–31 of this title; [and]
(XIV) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION AFTER
JUNE 30, 2025, SUPPLEMENTAL LOCAL IMPACT AID OF $500,000 $250,000 EACH
FISCAL YEAR FROM THE PROCEEDS OF THE RACETRAX LOTTERY GAME TO ANNE
ARUNDEL COUNTY, HOWARD COUNTY, AND THE CITY OF LAUREL IN PROPORTION
TO EACH JURISDICTION’S SHARE OF THE MONEY REQUIRED TO BE PAID UNDER §
11–404(D) OF THE BUSINESS REGULATION ARTICLE TO BE USED IN ACCORDANCE
WITH PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
[(xiv)] (XV) into the General Fund of the State the money that remains
in the State Lottery Fund from the proceeds of all lotteries after the distributions under
subsection (a) of this section and items (i) through [(xiii)] (XIV) of this paragraph.
(3) THE COMPTROLLER MAY NOT PAY THE SUPPLEMENTAL LOCAL
IMPACT AID REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(XIV) OF THIS SUBSECTION FOR ANY
FISCAL YEAR FOLLOWING THE FISCAL YEAR THAT:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 403
(I) LAUREL RACE COURSE IS NO LONGER USED FOR LIVE
RACING OR TRAINING; OR
(II) BACKSTRETCH WORKERS EMPLOYED AT LAUREL RACE
COURSE ARE NO LONGER LIVING ON THE LAUREL RACE COURSE PROPERTY.
(4) (I) ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY, HOWARD COUNTY, AND THE
CITY OF LAUREL SHALL USE THE SUPPLEMENTAL LOCAL IMPACT AID REQUIRED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(XIV) OF THIS SUBSECTION TO PROVIDE PROGRAMS AND
SERVICES TO THE COMMUNITIES SURROUNDING LAUREL RACE COURSE
INCLUDING:
1. HEALTH AND MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES;
2. INDIVIDUAL AND FAMILY COUNSELING;
3. DRUG AND ALCOHOL ADDICTION AWARENESS,
SUPPORT, AND TREATMENT;
4. SOCIAL SERVICES;
5. NUTRITION AND WELLNESS PROGRAMS; AND
6. TRANSPORTATION, IF NECESSARY, TO OFF–SITE
MEDICAL AND WELLNESS SERVICES.
(II) 1. ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY MAY USE THE
SUPPLEMENTAL LOCAL IMPACT AID UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(XIV) OF THIS
SUBSECTION ONLY TO PROVIDE GRANT FUNDING FOR THE PURPOSES IDENTIFIED
UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH TO NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS:
A. WITH A HISTORY OF WORKING WITH BACKSTRETCH
WORKERS EMPLOYED AT LAUREL RACE COURSE; AND
B. THAT EMPLOY SPANISH–SPEAKING PROGRAM STAFF
OR PROVIDE TRANSLATION SERVICES FOR NONNATIVE ENGLISH SPEAKERS.
2. IN CONSULTATION WITH AT LEAST TWO LAUREL
RACE COURSE BACKSTRETCH WORKERS DESIGNATED BY THE COUNTY EXECUTIVE,
ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY MAY USE THE PUBLIC GRANT APPLICATION PROCESS
DEVELOPED AND ADMINISTERED BY THE LAUREL RACE COURSE IMPACT ADVISORY
COMMITTEE TO PROVIDE GRANT FUNDING TO NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS UNDER
THIS SUBPARAGRAPH.
– 3 –

Ch. 403 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
3. A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION THAT RECEIVES GRANT
FUNDING UNDER THIS SUBPARAGRAPH MAY USE THE FUNDING ONLY TO PROVIDE
PROGRAMS AND SERVICES AT LAUREL RACE COURSE OR WITHIN 1 MILE OF LAUREL
RACE COURSE TO BACKSTRETCH WORKERS EMPLOYED AT LAUREL RACE COURSE
OR RESIDENTS LIVING IN THE 20724 POSTAL ZIP CODE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and, at the end of June 30, 2027,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 4 –